New York, session 2025-2026, A11387.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 503 of the retirement and social 2 security law, as amended by chapter 18 of the laws of 2012, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 a. The normal service retirement benefit specified in section five 5 hundred four of this article shall be payable to general members, other 6 than elective members, who have met the minimum service requirements 7 upon retirement and attainment of age sixty-two, provided, however, a 8 general member who is a peace officer employed by the unified court 9 system or a member of a teachers' retirement system may retire without 10 reduction of [his or her] such member's retirement benefit upon attain- 11 ment of at least fifty-five years of age and completion of thirty or 12 more years of service. For members who become members of the New York 13 state and local employees' retirement system on or after April first, 14 two thousand twelve, the normal service retirement benefits specified in 15 section five hundred four of this article shall be payable to general 16 members, other than elective members, who have met the minimum service 17 requirements upon retirement and attainment of age sixty-three; provided 18 that, a member who is a peace officer employed by the unified court 19 system may retire without reduction of such member's retirement benefit 20 upon attainment of at least fifty-five years of age and completion of 21 thirty or more years of service. 22 § 2. Subdivision a-1 of section 603 of the retirement and social secu- 23 rity law, as added by chapter 18 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read 24 as follows: 25 a-1. For members who first become a member of a public retirement 26 system of the state on or after April first, two thousand twelve, except EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07851-06-6 A. 11387 2 1 for uniformed court officers or peace officers employed by the unified 2 court system, the service retirement benefit specified in section six 3 hundred four of this article shall be payable to members who have met 4 the minimum service requirements upon retirement and have attained age 5 sixty-three. 6 § 3. Subdivisions a and b-1 of section 604 of the retirement and 7 social security law, subdivision a as amended and subdivision b-1 as 8 added by chapter 18 of the laws of 2012, are amended to read as follows: 9 a. The service retirement benefit at normal retirement age for a 10 member with less than twenty years of credited service, or less than 11 twenty-five years credited service for a member who joins the New York 12 state teachers' retirement system on or after January first, two thou- 13 sand ten, shall be a retirement allowance equal to one-sixtieth of final 14 average salary times years of credited service. Normal retirement age 15 for members who first become members of a public retirement system of 16 the state on or after April first, two thousand twelve shall be age 17 sixty-three; except that the normal retirement age shall be sixty-two 18 for a member who is a peace officer or uniformed court officer employed 19 by the unified court system. 20 b-1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 21 service retirement benefit for members with twenty or more years of 22 [credit] credited service who first become a member of a public retire- 23 ment system of the state on or after April first, two thousand twelve at 24 age sixty-three, or at age sixty-two for uniformed court officers or 25 peace officers employed by the unified court system, shall be a pension 26 equal to the sum of thirty-five per centum and one-fiftieth of final 27 average salary for each year of service in excess of twenty times final 28 average salary times years of credited service. In no event shall any 29 retirement benefit payable without optional modification be less than 30 the actuarially equivalent annuitized value of the member's contrib- 31 utions accumulated with interest at five percent per annum compounded 32 annually to the date of retirement. 33 § 4. Paragraph 3 of subdivision i of section 603 of the retirement and 34 social security law, as added by chapter 18 of the laws of 2012, is 35 amended to read as follows: 36 3. A member of a public retirement system of the state who has met the 37 minimum service requirement, but who is not a New York city transit 38 authority member, as defined in paragraph one of subdivision a of 39 section six hundred four-b of this article, may retire prior to normal 40 retirement age, but no earlier than attainment of age fifty-five, in 41 which event, the amount of [his or her] such member's retirement benefit 42 computed without optional modification shall be reduced by six and one- 43 half per centum for each year by which early retirement precedes age 44 sixty-three; provided, however, that for a member who is a uniformed 45 court officer or peace officer employed by the unified court system, the 46 retirement benefit computed without optional modification shall be 47 reduced in accordance with paragraph one of this subdivision. 48 § 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, none 49 of the provisions of this act shall be subject to the appropriation 50 requirement of section 25 of the retirement and social security law. 51 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would allow any Tier 6 member who is a uniformed court offi- cer or peace officer employed by the unified court system to retire without an early age reduction upon attaining age 55 with 30 years of creditable service. It would also reduce the normal retirement age from A. 11387 3 63 to 62 and lessen the reductions in benefits for those who retire prior to normal retirement age. We estimate that the state of New York's annual contributions will increase $5.5 million beginning FYE 2027, with near-term costs increas- ing 1.7% of salary for the affected participants, from 13.9% to 15.6%. Subsequent costs will vary annually but are expected to average 1.4% of salary, long-term. In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost of $41.7 million borne by the state of New York as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that payment will be made on March 1, 2027. These estimated costs are based on 3,515 affected members employed by the state of New York, with annual salary of approximately $265 million as of March 31, 2025. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated March 10, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-137. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.